Utah statutes.
76-10-1104.5.   Advertisement or solicitation for participation in lotteries -- Void in Utah.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Conspicuously printed" means printed in either larger or bolder type size than the adjacent and surrounding material so as to be clearly legible to any person viewing the print.

(b)  "Lottery" means the same as defined in Section 76-10-1101.

(2)  It is unlawful for any person to distribute or disseminate any advertisement or other written or printed material containing an advertisement or solicitation for participation in any lottery unless the advertisement or solicitation contains or includes the words "Void in Utah" conspicuously printed.

(3) (a)  Any person who is convicted of violating Subsection (2) shall be fined the sum of $2,500.

(b)  Any person who is twice or more convicted under this section shall be fined the sum of $10,000.



Enacted by Chapter 182, 2001 General Session

